Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-804
Legislative declarations.

The Legislature hereby declares that nongame, threatened, and endangered species have need of special protection and that it is in the public interest to preserve, protect, perpetuate, and enhance such species of this state through preservation of a satisfactory environment and an ecological balance. The purpose of section 37-811 and section 77-27,119.01 is to provide a means by which such protection may be financed through a voluntary checkoff designation on state income tax return forms. The intent of the Legislature is that the program of income tax checkoff is supplemental to any funding and in no way is intended to take the place of the funding that would otherwise be appropriated for such purpose.

Laws 1984, LB 466, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 258, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-432.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 354.